Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Information technology” means all present and future forms of hardware,  software
and services for data processing, office automation and telecommunications.
(b) “State agency” means a board, commission, department, division,  office or other en-
tity within the executive department, as defined in ORS 174.112, except:
(A) The Secretary of State;
(B) The State Treasurer;
(C) The Oregon State Lottery; and
(D) A public university that is listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer shall  adopt a policy and a procedure for state
agencies to follow in requesting funding  for information technology budgets and projects,
including replacements,  modernizations, upgrades and expansions of information technology
systems. Each state agency that intends to request funding for a budget or project  described
in this subsection shall submit the request to the State  Chief Information Officer and the
office of Enterprise Information Services for review not  later than the date in each biennium
that the State Chief Information Officer specifies.
(3) The State Chief Information Officer, in collaboration with the Legislative Fiscal Of-
fice, shall establish criteria for assigning priorities among the  budgets and projects described
in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The office of Enterprise Information Services, in collaboration with affected  state
agencies, shall evaluate budget and project requests the  state agencies submit under sub-
section (2) of this section against the criteria that the State  Chief Information Officer and
Legislative Fiscal Office specify under subsection (3) of  this section. The office of Enterprise
Information Services shall  then recommend for the State Chief Information Officer’s ap-
proval priority rankings  of the requests within the context of all of each state agency’s re-
quests, the requests in  a program area and the requests that the executive department
submits as a  whole. In recommending the ranking, the office of Enterprise Information
Services shall consider whether, and the extent to which, a request:
(a) Is  consistent with and supports implementation of the Enterprise Information Re-
sources Management Strategy described in ORS 276A.203 (4)(a)(M);
(b) Involves or promotes the use of shared systems, resources or data;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1090 (SB 1090-A) Page 1
(c) Uses commercially available systems or software;
(d) Enhances the information security posture of the agency or the state; and
(e) Reduces system redundancies within an agency, a program area or the state.
(5) Not later than  November 30 of the even-numbered year in each biennium the State
Chief Information Officer shall submit to the Governor and the Joint Legislative  Committee
on Information Management and Technology a report that:
(a) Lists the priority rankings described in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Includes a list of the information technology services and the recommendation  from
the State Chief Information Officer that is required under ORS 276A.203 (4)(a)(L); and
(c) Describes  critical information technology system or service needs not otherwise
identified within the priority rankings described in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) After the Legislative Assembly adopts a budget for the state,  the State Chief Infor-
mation Officer, in collaboration with  the Legislative Fiscal Office, shall submit to the Gov-
ernor and the Joint Legislative  Committee on Information Management and Technology not
later than  October 31 of the odd-numbered year in each biennium a report that lists all of
the information technology budget and project requests  that the Legislative Assembly ap-
proved.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1090 (SB 1090-A) Page 2